Utah statutes.
53A-25a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Blind student" means an individual between ages three through 21 who is eligible for special education services and who:

(a)  has a visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with correcting lenses or has a limited field of vision such that the widest diameter subtends an angular distance no greater than 20 degrees;

(b)  has a medically indicated expectation of visual deterioration; or

(c)  has functional blindness.

(2)  "Braille" means the system of reading and writing through touch, commonly known as English Braille.

(3)  "Functional blindness" means a visual impairment that renders a student unable to read or write print at a level commensurate with the student's cognitive abilities.

(4)  "Individualized education program" or "IEP" means a written statement developed for a student eligible for special education services pursuant to Section 602(a)(20) of part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 1401(a).



Enacted by Chapter 280, 1994 General Session

